North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-12 Attorney General
54-12-24.
State crime laboratory division.

A state crime laboratory is created as a division of the office of the attorney general. This division consists of a director, the state toxicologist, and such other personnel as may be appointed by the attorney general. The state crime laboratory may establish and charge fees for services rendered. The state crime laboratory must be administratively separated from the bureau of criminal investigation. The director serves at the pleasure of the attorney general and is entitled to receive a salary set by the attorney general within the limits of legislative appropriation.

The state crime laboratory shall employ the services of a qualified toxicologist who must be the state toxicologist. The attorney general shall appoint the state toxicologist. The attorney general may appoint such qualified deputy state toxicologists as may be necessary to exercise the authority and responsibility prescribed by law for the state toxicologist. The results of toxicological or chemical testing or analysis, other than provided for in section 39-20-13, made by the state toxicologist at the request of law enforcement agencies for criminal investigation may not be disclosed directly or indirectly by the state toxicologist or any agent or employee of the attorney general to anyone other than the person or agency requesting the test or analysis or to any other person upon whom the toxicological or chemical test was performed or the person’s authorized representative, except the state toxicologist may permit the inspection of the reports of any such test or analysis results by any other person having a proper interest therein as determined by the director of the state crime laboratory.

Upon the request of the state forensic examiner, any state’s attorney, sheriff, chief of police, coroner, or other local, state, or federal law enforcement official, the attorney general may make available to the requesting official the state crime laboratory’s facilities and personnel to assist in the investigation or detection of crimes and the apprehension or prosecution of criminals.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 469, § 12.

Note.

Section 14 of chapter 469, S.L. 2003, effective July 1, 2003, provides:

“

ADMINISTRATIVE RULES RELATING TO THE STATE CRIME LABORATORY.

The legislative council shall transfer administrative rules that the attorney general designates as relating to the state crime laboratory from the title of the North Dakota Administrative Code relating to the state department of health to the title of the North Dakota Administrative Code relating to the attorney general. The legislative council, after consulting the attorney general, may change references in any administrative rules to conform to this Act. These rules continue in effectiveness without promulgation under chapter 28-32 of the North Dakota Century Code. Any certifications, designations, or approvals made by the state toxicologist, including those made on or before the effective date of this Act, continue to be valid after the effective date.”

54-12-24.1.
Statewide sexual assault evidence collection kit tracking system — Exception.

The state crime laboratory shall develop and implement a statewide sexual assault evidence collection kit tracking system. The director of the state crime laboratory may contract with public or private entities, including private software and technology providers for the creation, operation, and maintenance of the system.

All medical providers, law enforcement agencies, forensic laboratories, or other persons or entities that collect evidence for, or receive, store, analyze, maintain, or preserve sexual assault kits, shall participate in the statewide sexual assault evidence collection kit tracking system for the purpose of tracking the location and status of all sexual assault kits in their custody. Participation must begin according to the implementation schedule established by the state crime laboratory.

The statewide sexual assault evidence collection kit tracking system must:

Track the location and status of each sexual assault kit throughout the criminal justice process, including the initial collection during examinations performed at medical facilities, receipt and storage at law enforcement agencies, receipt and analysis at forensic laboratories, storage, and any destruction of the kit after the applicable evidence is analyzed;

Allow participating entities that have custody of sexual assault kits to update and track the status and location of the kits;

Allow victims of sexual assault to track or receive updates anonymously regarding the status of their sexual assault kits; and

Use electronic or other technologies that allow for continuous access.

The state crime laboratory may phase in the requirement of initial participation in the statewide sexual assault evidence collection kit tracking system according to region, volume of sexual assault forensic evidence kits, or other appropriate classifications. All law enforcement agencies, medical providers, forensic laboratories, or other persons that collect evidence for, or receive, store, analyze, maintain, or preserve sexual assault forensic evidence kits are required to participate fully in the tracking system within one year of the tracking system’s initial date of operation.

Annually, the state crime laboratory shall post a report on the statewide sexual assault evidence collection kit tracking system on the attorney general’s website. The report must include the:

Total number of sexual assault kits in the system statewide and by jurisdiction;

Total and semiannual number of sexual assault kits where forensic analysis has been completed both statewide and by jurisdiction;

Number of sexual assault kits added to the system in the reporting period both statewide and by jurisdiction;

Total and semiannual number of sexual assault kits where forensic analysis has been requested but not completed both statewide and by jurisdiction; and

Total and semiannual number of sexual assault kits destroyed or removed from the system both statewide and by jurisdiction.

Records and information within the tracking system described in this section are exempt from disclosure under section 44-04-18.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 2, effective April 16, 2021.

54-12-25.
Attorney general may provide counsel to boards of health.

The attorney general, upon the request of a board of health established under chapter 23-35, may provide legal counsel or a written legal opinion to the board of health. The attorney general may enter an agreement with a board of health for reimbursement of expenses incurred by the attorney general in providing legal counsel to the board of health.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 484, § 1.

54-12-26.
Attorney general multijurisdictional drug task force grant fund — Continuing appropriation.

The attorney general may establish a multijurisdictional drug task force grant fund. The fund consists of funds appropriated by the legislative assembly. The funds are appropriated as a standing and continuing appropriation to the attorney general for the purpose of defraying the expenses and operating costs incurred by a multijurisdictional drug task force. The attorney general shall develop guidelines for the qualifications for receipt of grant funds, the disbursement of grant funds, and the necessary accounting procedures for the use of grant funds. In this section, “multijurisdictional drug task force” means a law enforcement task force:

Organized and created in this state by a written mutual aid or joint powers agreement;

Comprised of persons who are employed by, or acting under the authority of, different governmental entities, including federal, state, county, or municipal governments, or any combination of these agencies; and

Operated and established to enhance and facilitate interagency coordination, acquisition of intelligence information, and investigations of controlled substance and other drug-related crimes.

If the attorney general receives federal funds in excess of the year 2006 level of Byrne grant funding that may be used to defray the expenses and operating costs incurred by a multijurisdictional drug task force during the 2007-09 biennium, the attorney general may seek emergency commission approval to receive and spend the additional federal funds but may not spend moneys from the funds appropriated by the legislative assembly to the extent of the additional federal funds received for this purpose for the biennium beginning July 1, 2007, and ending June 30, 2009.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 459, § 2.

54-12-27.
Twenty-four seven sobriety program.

The attorney general may establish a statewide twenty-four seven sobriety program. The sobriety program involves coordination among state, county, and municipal agencies to implement procedures as alternatives to incarceration for offenders charged with, or convicted of, driving under the influence of alcohol or controlled substances, domestic violence, abuse or neglect of a child, or for other offenses in which alcohol or controlled substances are involved.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 469, § 5.

54-12-28.
Twenty-four seven sobriety program guidelines, program fees, and records.

The attorney general, in cooperation with law enforcement, the judiciary, the department of corrections and rehabilitation, and the traffic safety division of the department of transportation, may develop guidelines, policies, and procedures to administer the twenty-four seven sobriety program and to test offenders to enforce compliance with the sobriety program, including sobriety testing twice per day seven days per week, electronic monitoring, including home surveillance and remote electronic alcohol monitoring, urine testing and drug patch testing, and to establish program fees, all of which are not subject to chapter 28-32.

To assist in monitoring the status of the twenty-four seven sobriety program, the attorney general may gather program records and statistics. Agencies or companies participating in the twenty-four seven program shall provide record and statistic information requested by the attorney general within thirty days of the request.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 469, § 5; 2017, ch. 366, § 5, effective February 23, 2017.

54-12-28.1.
Law enforcement acceptance of department of transportation action.

A law enforcement agency shall accept, the same as if ordered by the court, an individual as part of the twenty-four seven program if the individual provides documentation that the individual will be issued a temporary restricted license by the department of transportation which is conditioned on participation in the twenty-four seven program.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 268, § 13, effective April 15, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section became effective April 15, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 15 of chapter 268, S.L. 2015.

54-12-29.
Twenty-four seven sobriety program fund — Continuing appropriation.

There is created the twenty-four seven sobriety program fund to be administered by the attorney general. The fund includes appropriated funds; moneys received from grants from the United States; agencies of this state; private grants, gifts, or donations; and program fees. The funds are appropriated as a continuing appropriation to the attorney general for expenses necessary for the administration and operation of the sobriety program, including staff support, training and travel costs, computer software and hardware, testing equipment, and supplies.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 469, § 5.

54-12-30.
Twenty-four seven sobriety program fees.

A criminal justice agency may collect program fees from offenders participating in the twenty-four seven sobriety program, including fees for twice per day breath alcohol testing, urine testing, drug patch testing, installation and deactivation fees for remote electronic alcohol monitoring devices, and remote electronic alcohol monitoring daily fees. The criminal justice agency shall pay all program fees into the general fund of the governing body. The fees may only be applied to twenty-four seven sobriety program support services, equipment maintenance and replacement, and compliance with the program. The governing body shall pay any daily fees collected for remote electronic alcohol monitoring to the twenty-four seven sobriety program fund.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 469, § 5.

54-12-31.
Bond conditions.

A district or municipal court of this state may order an offender charged with a violation of section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance, domestic violence, abuse or neglect of a child, or other offense in which alcohol or controlled substances are involved to participate in the twenty-four seven sobriety program as a condition of bond.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 469, § 5.

54-12-32.
Blue alert notice system.

Upon the request of a law enforcement agency that is investigating an offense against a law enforcement officer, the bureau of criminal investigation shall activate a blue alert public notice to aid in the apprehension of an individual who is a suspect in an offense if:

An individual has threatened a law enforcement officer with a deadly weapon, has used a deadly weapon against a law enforcement officer, has caused a law enforcement officer to suffer serious bodily injury or death, or the officer has been abducted or is missing while on duty;

The individual has fled the scene of the offense and a description of the individual or the individual’s vehicle is available for broadcast;

The law enforcement agency investigating the offense has determined the individual poses a threat to the public or other law enforcement personnel; and

Dissemination of available information to the public may help avert further harm or assist in the apprehension of the suspect.

The bureau of criminal investigation, in cooperation with the highway patrol and the division of state radio of the department of emergency services, shall prepare an operational plan to prepare for and respond to requests for activation of a blue alert notice.

As used in this section, the term “blue alert notice” means a quick response and notice that is issued after an individual has threatened a law enforcement officer with a deadly weapon, used a deadly weapon against a law enforcement officer, caused a law enforcement officer to suffer serious bodily injury or death, or the officer has been abducted or is missing while on duty, and the individual has left the scene of the offense.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 376, § 1, effective March 25, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section became effective March 25, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 2 of chapter 376, S.L. 2015.

54-12-33.
Human trafficking commission.

The attorney general may establish a human trafficking commission, comprised of designees from state, local, and tribal agencies which have contact with victims or perpetrators, nongovernmental organizations that represent or work with victims, and other organizations and individuals, including victims, whose expertise would benefit the commission. The attorney general may establish the commission by appointing an existing statewide coalition.

The commission shall:

Collect and evaluate data on human trafficking in this state and submit an annual report to the attorney general, governor, and legislative assembly;

Promote awareness and provide information to education personnel and the general public about human trafficking, victim remedies and services, and trafficking prevention;

Promote training on human trafficking prevention and victim services for state and local employees who may have recurring contact with victims or perpetrators;

Promote training on human trafficking investigation and prosecution and on missing and murdered indigenous people with the North Dakota state’s attorney’s association, the North Dakota peace officers standards and training board, and state and local law enforcement agencies;

Present annually regarding human trafficking awareness and prevention at professional development conferences directed toward teachers, administrators, and support staff which are hosted by educational organizations in this state or by the department of public instruction; and

Conduct other appropriate activities.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 377, § 1, effective March 25, 2015; 2017, ch. 367, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 433, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 434, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Note.

Section 54-12-33 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 433, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1541; and Section 1 of Chapter 434, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1311.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2015.

54-12-33.1.
Human trafficking prevention training — Exemptions — Immunity — Continuing appropriation.

As used in this section:

“Human trafficking” means human trafficking as defined in chapter 12.1-41.

“Human trafficking commission” means the commission established under section 54-12-33.

“Lodging establishment” means any hotel, motel, resort, building, or structure that is used to provide sleeping accommodations to transient guests.

“Proprietor” means the person in charge of a lodging establishment and includes an owner, lessee, and manager.

Within ninety days of the effective date of this section, the human trafficking commission shall establish an educational training program with a focus on the accurate and prompt identification and reporting of, or response to, suspected human trafficking. To the extent possible, the human trafficking commission shall allow the use of existing training modules and materials. The training must include:

Human trafficking awareness;

How to recognize potential victims of human trafficking;

How to identify activities commonly associated with human trafficking; and

Effective responses to human trafficking situations, including how to report suspected human trafficking to law enforcement.

A proprietor may:

Provide each onsite employee with the training described in subsection 2.

In an employee roster or in each employee’s personnel file, annually certify each employee has received the training approved by the human trafficking commission.

Conduct an ongoing awareness campaign for employees which addresses the information described in subsection 2.

A proprietor may post and maintain a poster approved and provided by the human trafficking commission which contains the information described in subsection 2. The poster must include the contact information for an organization that provides assistance and support services to human trafficking victims. The poster may be visibly displayed at the lodging establishment’s check-in area, lobby, or transient guest services.

A proprietor or employee of a lodging establishment who acts in good faith is immune from liability in any civil action for reporting suspected human trafficking activities.

The human trafficking commission may seek, apply for, accept, and receive any donation, gift, grant, or bequest offered or tendered from public or private sources for the purpose of furthering the objectives of the human trafficking prevention training and incentivizing proprietors to participate in the human trafficking prevention training. All moneys received or accepted under this subsection are appropriated on a continuing basis to the human trafficking commission.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 435, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

54-12-34.
Criminal justice data information sharing system.

The attorney general shall maintain a criminal justice data information sharing system within the bureau of criminal investigation for the exchange of criminal justice data information by judicial, law enforcement, and emergency services agencies, and the department of transportation. Only an authorized individual employed by a criminal justice agency as defined in section 12-60-16.1, the department of transportation, a state court, or the department of emergency services or any other individual approved by the attorney general or the attorney general’s designee may access the system. For access to the criminal justice data information sharing system, an individual shall undergo a criminal history background check, including a fingerprint check, and meet eligibility access criteria in accordance with the rules adopted under this section.

The criminal justice data information sharing system may be accessed only in accordance with rules adopted under this section. Any law enforcement record in the possession of the attorney general through the criminal justice data information sharing system is an exempt record. Criminal justice data information about an offense committed by a child if the offense has not been transferred under section 27-20.4-21 to another court having jurisdiction of the offense and information about a child victim or witness is confidential.

The attorney general shall provide staff to maintain the criminal justice data information system and provide administrative support for the advisory board.

A criminal justice information advisory board must be appointed, consisting of:

The chief justice of the supreme court or the chief justice’s designee.

The director of the department of emergency services or the director’s designee.

The director of the department of corrections and rehabilitation or the director’s designee.

The superintendent of the state highway patrol or the superintendent’s designee.

The chief of the bureau of criminal investigation, who is the chairman of the advisory board.

The chief information officer of the state or the chief information officer’s designee.

The director of the department of transportation or the director’s designee.

A representative of a city police department, appointed by the attorney general from a list of two or more nominees from the North Dakota chiefs of police association.

A representative of a county sheriff’s office, appointed by the attorney general from a list of two or more nominees from the North Dakota sheriffs and deputies association.

A state’s attorney, appointed by the attorney general from a list of two or more nominees from the North Dakota state’s attorney’s association.

A city government representative, appointed by the attorney general from a list of two or more nominees from the league of cities.

A county government representative, appointed by the attorney general from a list of two or more nominees from the association of counties.

Advisory board members who are not permanent full-time state employees are entitled to compensation of seventy-five dollars per day and mileage and expenses as provided by law for state employees. With the exception of the chief of the bureau of criminal investigation, advisory board members appointed under this section serve staggered three-year terms.

The attorney general, after consultation with the advisory board, shall adopt rules to establish eligibility for access to the criminal justice data information sharing system; to implement the collection, storage, and sharing of criminal justice information and the systems necessary to perform those functions; and to address the operation of the advisory board.

The attorney general shall implement a missing person repository for authorized users to enter missing person information in accordance with rules established by the bureau of criminal investigation. Missing person information, including demographic data related to indigenous people, which is entered by an authorized user or made available to an authorized user by a federally recognized tribe in this state must be included in the repository. Records under this subsection are exempt records that may be disclosed only in accordance with bureau of criminal investigation rules.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 37, § 9, effective July 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 436, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 175, § 8, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 245, § 42, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 54-12-34 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 8 of Chapter 175, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2283; and Section 42 of Chapter 245, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1035.

54-12-35.
Law enforcement officer tuition and fees waiver.

To the extent the annual cap under this section has not been met, an individual who is employed as a full-time law enforcement officer in this state, who has a minimum of two years of employment, and who is licensed under chapter 12-63, is entitled to a waiver of twenty-five percent of resident tuition and fees of any institution of higher education under the control of the state board of higher education if the law enforcement officer:

Maintains satisfactory performance with the officer’s law enforcement agency;

Obtains authorization to participate in the waiver program and a certificate of verification from the law enforcement officer’s superior officer which attests to the officer’s satisfactory performance;

Meets all admission requirements of the institution; and

Pursues studies leading to a degree from an associate degree program or a baccalaureate degree program.

The law enforcement officer may receive the waiver for up to five years from the date the law enforcement officer first receives a waiver under this section.

The institution of higher education shall waive twenty-five percent of the officer’s tuition and fees after subtracting awarded federal financial aid grants and state scholarships and grants for an eligible law enforcement officer during the time the officer is enrolled. To remain eligible for the waiver, the officer shall comply with all requirements of the institution for continued attendance and award of an associate degree or a baccalaureate degree.

The law enforcement officer shall include the certificate of verification when applying for enrollment to the institution of higher education.

The total amount of waivers granted each academic year by institutions under the control of the state board of higher education may not exceed five hundred thousand dollars.

The attorney general shall adopt the rules necessary to implement this section.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 28, § 11, effective July 1, 2017.